District of Columbia statutes.
4-414

Authorization of grants to develop satellite child development home programs.

The Department is hereby authorized to make grants to private agencies that work with child development homes and to licensed child development centers for the purpose of developing or operating satellite child development home programs.

History

Sept. 19, 1979, D.C. Law 3-16, § 15, 26 DCR 20
Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-174, § 2(c), 32 DCR 743

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-314.
1973 Ed., § 3-314.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 3-16, § 15a, concerning comprehensive child development programs, see § 2 of the Early Learning Quality Improvement Network Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-238, March 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1326).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 3-16, § 15a, concerning child development programs, see § 2 of the Early Learning Quality Improvement Network Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-528, Dec. 18, 2014, 62 DCR 1, 20 STAT 4446).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 3-16, § 15a, concerning comprehensive child development programs, see § 2 of the Early Learning Quality Improvement Network Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-184, Oct. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 14215).